Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3109
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Nebraska Statutory Thresholds for Settlements Involving Minors Act is to set forth standards and procedures for settling claims involving minors.

Laws 2025, LB341, § 2.